Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 10. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 50-73.144.
Application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among States enacting it.

This chapter shall be construed in furtherance of the policies of giving maximum effect to the principle of freedom of contract and of enforcing partnership agreements.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2003, c. 340.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 340 added the subsection designation A, and added subsection B.

§ 50-73.145.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Virginia Uniform Partnership Act (1996).

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.146.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

50-73.146

pertaining to severability, derived from 2001, c. 342.

§ 50-73.147.
Applicability.

Before January 1, 2000, this chapter governs only a partnership formed:

On and after July 1, 1997, unless that partnership is continuing the business of a dissolved partnership under § 50-41 of the Uniform Partnership Act as it existed on July 1, 1997; and

Before July 1, 1997, that elects, as provided by subsection C, to be governed by this chapter.

Effective January 1, 2000, this chapter governs all partnerships.

Before January 1, 2000, a partnership voluntarily may elect, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be governed by this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the liability of the partnership’s partners to third parties apply to limit those partners’ liability to a third party who had done business with the partnership within one year preceding the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter, only if the third party knows or has received a notification of the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.148.
Transition.

Before January 1, 2000, a limited partnership voluntarily may elect, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be governed by this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the liability of the partnership’s partners to third parties apply to limit those partners’ liability to a third party who had done business with the partnership within one year preceding the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter, only if the third party knows or has received a notification of the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.149.
Savings clause.

This chapter does not affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued before July 1, 1997.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.150.
Property title records.

Whenever the records in the office of the clerk of the Commission reflect that a partnership has changed or corrected its name, merged into a domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership or partnership, converted into a domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust or limited partnership, or domesticated in or from another jurisdiction, the clerk of the Commission, upon request, shall issue a certificate reciting such change, correction, merger, conversion or domestication. The certificate may be admitted to record in the deed books, in accordance with §

17.1-227

, of any clerk’s office within the jurisdiction of which any property of the partnership is located in order to maintain the continuity of title records. The person filing the certificate shall pay a fee of $10 to the clerk of the court, but no tax shall be due thereon.

Whenever a partnership formed under the laws of another jurisdiction has changed or corrected its name, merged into a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership or partnership, converted into another type of business entity, or domesticated in another jurisdiction, and it cannot or chooses not to obtain a certificate reciting such change, correction, merger, conversion or domestication from the clerk of the Commission pursuant to subsection A, a similar certificate by any competent authority of the foreign partnership’s jurisdiction of formation may be admitted to record in the deed books, in accordance with §

17.1-227

, of any clerk’s office within the jurisdiction of which any property of the partnership is located in order to maintain the continuity of title records. The person filing the certificate shall pay a fee of $10 to the clerk of the court, but no tax shall be due thereon.

History.

2007, c. 771.